Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-289
Wire communication, defined.

Wire communication means any aural transfer made in whole or in part through the use of facilities for the transmission of communications by the aid of wire, cable, or other like connection, including the use of such connection in a switching station, between the point of origin and the point of reception furnished or operated by any person engaged in providing or operating such facilities for the transmission of communications. Wire communication includes any electronic storage of such communication but does not include the radio portion of a cordless telephone communication that is transmitted between the cordless telephone handset and the base unit.

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 151.